Missouri, session 2026, SB1786.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 71.012, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 71.012,
to read as follows:
71.012. 1. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 71.015 and 71.860 to 71.920, the governing body of
any city, town or village may annex unincorporated areas
which are contiguous and compact to the existing corporate
limits of the city, town or village pursuant to this
section.
(2) The term "contiguous and compact" does not include
a situation whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be
annexed is contiguous to the annexing city, town or village
only by a railroad line, trail, pipeline or other strip of
real property less than one-quarter mile in width within the
city, town or village so that the boundaries of the city,
town or village after annexation would leave unincorporated
areas between the annexed area and the prior boundaries of
the city, town or village connected only by such railroad
line, trail, pipeline or other such strip of real property.

SB 1786 2
(3) The term contiguous and compact shall include a
situation whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be
annexed would be contiguous and compact to the existing
corporate limits of the city, town, or village but for an
intervening state highway or interstate highway as defined
in section 304.001, or railroad right-of-way, regardless of
whether any other city, town, or village has annexed such
state or interstate highway or railroad right-of-way or
otherwise has an easement in such state or interstate
highway or railroad right-of-way.
(4) The term contiguous and compact does not prohibit
voluntary annexations pursuant to this section merely
because such voluntary annexation would create an island of
unincorporated area within the city, town or village, so
long as the owners of the unincorporated island were also
given the opportunity to voluntarily annex into the city,
town or village.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section,
the governing body of any city, town or village in any
county of the third classification which borders a county of
the fourth classification, a county of the second
classification and the Mississippi River may annex areas
along a road or highway up to two miles from existing
boundaries of the city, town or village or the governing
body in any city, town or village in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government with a
population of at least twenty-four thousand inhabitants but
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants and such county
contains a state correctional center may voluntarily annex
such correctional center pursuant to the provisions of this
section if the correctional center is along a road or

SB 1786 3
highway within two miles from the existing boundaries of the
city, town or village.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section to the contrary, a city with more than seventy-one
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants
that owns and operates an airport that is outside the
boundaries of such city may annex such airport regardless of
whether the boundaries of such airport are contiguous and
compact to the existing corporate limits of such city.
2. (1) When a notarized petition, requesting
annexation and signed by the owners of all fee interests of
record in all tracts of real property located within the
area proposed to be annexed, or a request for annexation
signed under the authority of the governing body of any
common interest community and approved by a majority vote of
unit owners located within the area proposed to be annexed
is presented to the governing body of the city, town or
village, the governing body shall hold a public hearing
concerning the matter not less than fourteen nor more than
sixty days after the petition is received, and the hearing
shall be held not less than seven days after notice of the
hearing is published in a newspaper of general circulation
qualified to publish legal matters and located within the
boundary of the petitioned city, town or village. If no
such newspaper exists within the boundary of such city, town
or village, then the notice shall be published in the
qualified newspaper nearest the petitioned city, town or
village. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term
"common-interest community" shall mean a condominium as said
term is used in chapter 448, or a common-interest community,
a cooperative, or a planned community.

SB 1786 4
(a) A "common-interest community" shall be defined as
real property with respect to which a person, by virtue of
such person's ownership of a unit, is obliged to pay for
real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance or
improvement of other real property described in a
declaration. "Ownership of a unit" does not include a
leasehold interest of less than twenty years in a unit,
including renewal options;
(b) A "cooperative" shall be defined as a common-
interest community in which the real property is owned by an
association, each of whose members is entitled by virtue of
such member's ownership interest in the association to
exclusive possession of a unit;
(c) A "planned community" shall be defined as a common-
interest community that is not a condominium or a
cooperative. A condominium or cooperative may be part of a
planned community.
(2) At the public hearing any interested person,
corporation or political subdivision may present evidence
regarding the proposed annexation. If, after holding the
hearing, the governing body of the city, town or village
100 determines that the annexation is reasonable and necessary
101 to the proper development of the city, town or village, and
102 the city, town or village has the ability to furnish normal
103 municipal services to the area to be annexed within a
104 reasonable time, it may, subject to the provisions of
105 subdivision (3) of this subsection, annex the territory by
106 ordinance without further action.
107 (3) If a written objection to the proposed annexation
108 is filed with the governing body of the city, town or
109 village not later than fourteen days after the public
110 hearing by at least five percent of the qualified voters of

SB 1786 5
111 the city, town or village, or two qualified voters of the
112 area sought to be annexed if the same contains two qualified
113 voters, the provisions of sections 71.015 and 71.860 to
114 71.920, shall be followed.
115 3. If no objection is filed, the city, town or village
116 shall extend its limits by ordinance to include such
117 territory, specifying with accuracy the new boundary lines
118 to which the city's, town's or village's limits are
119 extended. Upon duly enacting such annexation ordinance, the
120 city, town or village shall cause three certified copies of
121 the same to be filed with the county assessor and the clerk
122 of the county wherein the city, town or village is located,
123 and one certified copy to be filed with the election
124 authority, if different from the clerk of the county which
125 has jurisdiction over the area being annexed, whereupon the
126 annexation shall be complete and final and thereafter all
127 courts of this state shall take judicial notice of the
128 limits of that city, town or village as so extended.
129 4. That a petition requesting annexation is not or was
130 not verified or notarized shall not affect the validity of
131 an annexation heretofore or hereafter undertaken in
132 accordance with this section.
133 5. Any action of any kind seeking to deannex from any
134 city, town, or village any area annexed under this section,
135 or seeking in any way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or
136 otherwise challenge such annexation or oust such city, town,
137 or village from jurisdiction over such annexed area shall be
138 brought within five years of the date of adoption of the
139 annexation ordinance.
✓